finished/san.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [N] [SG] [DU] [PL] [NOM] [ACC] [DAT] [ABL] [GEN] [INS] [LOC] [VOC] [ADJ] [MASC] [FEM] [NEUT] {योः} {या} {े} {ी} {ीन्} {ये} {ेः} {्योः} {ीनाम्} {ौ} {यः} {ीः} {्या} {्यै} {याः} {ीनि} {्यौ} {्यः} {ि} {्याः} {्याम्} {ू} {वः} {ो} {ून्} {वे} {ोः} {्वोः} {ूनाम्} {ूनि} {ूः} {्वा} {्वै} {्वौ} {्वः} {्वाः} {्वाम्} {ु}

LEXICON Root

[N]:0 Noun;
[ADJ]: Adjective;

LEXICON aMasc

[ABL][SG]:ात् #;
[ABL][DU]:ाभ्याम् #;
[ABL][PL]:ेभ्यः #;

[ACC][SG]:म् #;
[ACC][DU]:ौ #;
[ACC][PL]:ान् #;

[DAT][SG]:ाय #;
[DAT][DU]:ाभ्याम् #;
[DAT][PL]:ेभ्यः #;

[GEN][SG]:स्य #;
[GEN][DU]:योः #;
[GEN][PL]:ानाम् #;

[INS][SG]:ेन #;
[INS][DU]:ाभ्याम् #;
[INS][PL]:ैः #;

[LOC][SG]:े #;
[LOC][DU]:योः #;
[LOC][PL]:ेषु #;

[NOM][SG]:ः #;
[NOM][DU]:ौ #;
[NOM][PL]:ाः #;

[VOC][SG]:0 #;
[VOC][DU]:ौ #;
[VOC][PL]:ाः #;

LEXICON aFem

[ABL][SG]:याः #;
[ABL][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[ABL][PL]:भ्यः #;

[ACC][SG]:म् #;
[ACC][DU]:{े} #;
[ACC][PL]:ः #;

[DAT][SG]:यै #;
[DAT][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[DAT][PL]:भ्यः #;

[GEN][SG]:याः #;
[GEN][DU]:{योः} #;
[GEN][PL]:नाम् #;

[INS][SG]:{या} #;
[INS][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[INS][PL]:भिः #;

[LOC][SG]:याम् #;
[LOC][DU]:{योः} #;
[LOC][PL]:सु #;

[NOM][SG]:0 #;
[NOM][DU]:{े} #;
[NOM][PL]:ः #;

[VOC][SG]:{े} #;
[VOC][DU]:{े} #;
[VOC][PL]:ः #;

LEXICON aNeuter

[ABL][SG]:ात् #;
[ABL][DU]:ाभ्याम् #;
[ABL][PL]:ेभ्यः #;

[ACC][SG]:म् #;
[ACC][DU]:े #;
[ACC][PL]:ानि #;

[DAT][SG]:ाय #;
[DAT][DU]:ाभ्याम् #;
[DAT][PL]:ेभ्यः #;

[GEN][SG]:स्य #;
[GEN][DU]:योः #;
[GEN][PL]:ानाम् #;

[INS][SG]:ेन #;
[INS][DU]:ाभ्याम् #;
[INS][PL]:ैः #;

[LOC][SG]:े #;
[LOC][DU]:योः #;
[LOC][PL]:ेषु #;

[NOM][SG]:म् #;
[NOM][DU]:े #;
[NOM][PL]:ानि #;

[VOC][SG]:0 #;
[VOC][DU]:े #;
[VOC][PL]:ानि #;

LEXICON iMasc

[ABL][SG]:{ेः} #;
[ABL][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[ABL][PL]:भ्यः #;

[ACC][SG]:म् #;
[ACC][DU]:{ी} #;
[ACC][PL]:{ीन्} #;

[DAT][SG]:{ये} #;
[DAT][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[DAT][PL]:भ्यः #;

[GEN][SG]:{ेः} #;
[GEN][DU]:{्योः} #;
[GEN][PL]:{ीनाम्} #;

[INS][SG]:ना #;
[INS][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[INS][PL]:भिः #;

[LOC][SG]:{ौ} #;
[LOC][DU]:{्योः} #;
[LOC][PL]:षु #;

[NOM][SG]:ः #;
[NOM][DU]:{ी} #;
[NOM][PL]:{यः} #;

[VOC][SG]:{े} #;
[VOC][DU]:{ी} #;
[VOC][PL]:{यः} #;

LEXICON iFem

[ABL][SG]:{याः} #;
[ABL][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[ABL][PL]:भ्यः #;

[ACC][SG]:म् #;
[ACC][DU]:{ी} #;
[ACC][PL]:{ीः} #;

[DAT][SG]:{्यै} #;
[DAT][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[DAT][PL]:भ्यः #;

[GEN][SG]:{ेः} #;
[GEN][DU]:{्योः} #;
[GEN][PL]:{ीनाम्} #;

[INS][SG]:{्या} #;
[INS][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[INS][PL]:भिः #;

[LOC][SG]:{्याम्} #;
[LOC][DU]:{योः} #;
[LOC][PL]:षु #;

[NOM][SG]:ः #;
[NOM][DU]:{ी} #;
[NOM][PL]:{यः} #;

[VOC][SG]:{े} #;
[VOC][DU]:{ी} #;
[VOC][PL]:{यः} #;

LEXICON iNeuter

[ABL][SG]:नः #;
[ABL][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[ABL][PL]:भ्यः #;

[ACC][SG]:0 #;
[ACC][DU]:नी #;
[ACC][PL]:{ीनि} #;

[DAT][SG]:ने #;
[DAT][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[DAT][PL]:भ्यः #;

[GEN][SG]:नः #;
[GEN][DU]:नोः #;
[GEN][PL]:{ीनाम्} #;

[INS][SG]:ना #;
[INS][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[INS][PL]:भिः #;

[LOC][SG]:नि #;
[LOC][DU]:नोः #;
[LOC][PL]:षु #;

[NOM][SG]:0 #;
[NOM][DU]:नी #;
[NOM][PL]:{ीनि} #;

[VOC][SG]:0 #;
[VOC][DU]:नी #;
[VOC][PL]:{ीनि} #;

LEXICON eeFem

[ABL][SG]:{्याः} #;
[ABL][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[ABL][PL]:भ्यः #;

[ACC][SG]:म् #;
[ACC][DU]:{्यौ} #;
[ACC][PL]:ः #;

[DAT][SG]:{्यै} #;
[DAT][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[DAT][PL]:भ्यः #;

[GEN][SG]:{्याः} #;
[GEN][DU]:{्योः} #;
[GEN][PL]:नाम् #;

[INS][SG]:{्या} #;
[INS][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[INS][PL]:भिः #;

[LOC][SG]:{्याम्} #;
[LOC][DU]:{्योः} #;
[LOC][PL]:षु #;

[NOM][SG]:0 #;
[NOM][DU]:{्यौ} #;
[NOM][PL]:{्यः} #;

[VOC][SG]:{ि} #;
[VOC][DU]:{्यौ} #;
[VOC][PL]:{्यः} #;

LEXICON uMasc

[ABL][SG]:{ोः} #;
[ABL][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[ABL][PL]:भ्यः #;

[ACC][SG]:म् #;
[ACC][DU]:{ू} #;
[ACC][PL]:{ून्} #;

[DAT][SG]:{वे} #;
[DAT][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[DAT][PL]:भ्यः #;

[GEN][SG]:{ोः} #;
[GEN][DU]:{्वोः} #;
[GEN][PL]:{ूनाम्} #;

[INS][SG]:ना #;
[INS][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[INS][PL]:भिः #;

[LOC][SG]:{ौ} #;
[LOC][DU]:{्वोः} #;
[LOC][PL]:षु #;

[NOM][SG]:ः #;
[NOM][DU]:{ू} #;
[NOM][PL]:{वः} #;

[VOC][SG]:{ो} #;
[VOC][DU]:{ू} #;
[VOC][PL]:{वः} #;

LEXICON uFem

[ABL][SG]:{ोः} #;
[ABL][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[ABL][PL]:भ्यः #;

[ACC][SG]:म् #;
[ACC][DU]:{ू} #;
[ACC][PL]:{ूः} #;

[DAT][SG]:{्वै} #;
[DAT][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[DAT][PL]:भ्यः #;

[GEN][SG]:{ोः} #;
[GEN][DU]:{्वोः} #;
[GEN][PL]:{ूनाम्} #;

[INS][SG]:{्वा} #;
[INS][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[INS][PL]:भिः #;

[LOC][SG]:{ौ} #;
[LOC][DU]:{्वोः} #;
[LOC][PL]:षु #;

[NOM][SG]:ः #;
[NOM][DU]:{ू} #;
[NOM][PL]:{वः} #;

[VOC][SG]:{ो} #;
[VOC][DU]:{ू} #;
[VOC][PL]:{वः} #;

LEXICON uNeuter

[ABL][SG]:नः #;
[ABL][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[ABL][PL]:भ्यः #;

[ACC][SG]:0 #;
[ACC][DU]:नी #;
[ACC][PL]:{ूनि} #;

[DAT][SG]:ने #;
[DAT][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[DAT][PL]:भ्यः #;

[GEN][SG]:नः #;
[GEN][DU]:नोः #;
[GEN][PL]:{ूनाम्} #;

[INS][SG]:ना #;
[INS][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[INS][PL]:भिः #;

[LOC][SG]:नि #;
[LOC][DU]:नोः #;
[LOC][PL]:षु #;

[NOM][SG]:0 #;
[NOM][DU]:नी #;
[NOM][PL]:{ूनि} #;

[VOC][SG]:0 #;
[VOC][DU]:नी #;
[VOC][PL]:{ूनि} #;

LEXICON ooFem

[ABL][SG]:{्वाः} #;
[ABL][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[ABL][PL]:भ्यः #;

[ACC][SG]:म् #;
[ACC][DU]:{्वौ} #;
[ACC][PL]:ः #;

[DAT][SG]:{्वै} #;
[DAT][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[DAT][PL]:भ्यः #;

[GEN][SG]:{्वाः} #;
[GEN][DU]:{्वोः} #;
[GEN][PL]:नाम् #;

[INS][SG]:{्वा} #;
[INS][DU]:भ्याम् #;
[INS][PL]:भिः #;

[LOC][SG]:{्वाम्} #;
[LOC][DU]:{्वोः} #;
[LOC][PL]:षु #;

[NOM][SG]:ः #;
[NOM][DU]:{्वौ} #;
[NOM][PL]:{्वः} #;

[VOC][SG]:{ु} #;
[VOC][DU]:{्वौ} #;
[VOC][PL]:{्वः} #;

LEXICON Adjective
बल[NEUT]:बल aNeuter;
मल[FEM]:मला aFem;
अमल[MASC]:अमल aMasc;
अमल[NEUT]:अमल aNeuter;
नलद[FEM]:नलदा aFem;
मृत[NEUT]:मृत aNeuter;
लोह[FEM]:लोहा aFem;
वचन[MASC]:वचन aMasc;
विष[NEUT]:विष aNeuter;
शिव[FEM]:शिवा aFem;
हिम[NEUT]:हिम aNeuter;
अंशक[MASC]:अंशक aMasc;
अंशक[FEM]:अंशिका aFem;
आहार[FEM]:आहारी eeFem;
ईशान[NEUT]:ईशान aNeuter;
उच्च[FEM]:उच्चा aFem;
कनीन[NEUT]:कनीन aNeuter;
कल्य[MASC]:कल्य aMasc;
कल्ल[FEM]:कल्ला aFem;
नाटक[FEM]:नाटकी eeFem;
नाटक[NEUT]:नाटक aNeuter;
भारत[FEM]:भारती eeFem;
भेषज[FEM]:भेषजी eeFem;
भेषज[NEUT]:भेषज aNeuter;
भोजन[MASC]:भोजन aMasc;
भोजन[FEM]:भोजनी eeFem;
मधुर[FEM]:मधुरा aFem;
वज्र[FEM]:वज्र aNeuter;
वानर[FEM]:वानरी eeFem;
वृषभ[FEM]:वृषभा aFem;
शारद[FEM]:शारदी eeFem;
सर्प[MASC]:सर्प aMasc;
सर्प[FEM]:सर्पी eeFem;
साधन[NEUT]:साधन aNeuter;
हृदय[FEM]:हृदया aFem;
कृष्ण[MASC]:कृष्ण aMasc;
कृष्ण[FEM]:कृष्णा aFem;
जङ्गल[NEUT]:जङ्गल aNeuter;
जीवित[FEM]:जीविता aFem;
तर्पण[FEM]:तर्पणी eeFem;
दीर्घ[MASC]:दीर्घ aMasc;
दुग्ध[FEM]:दुग्धा aFem;
नवोदय[NEUT]:नवोदय aNeuter;
पुराण[FEM]:पुराणा aFem;
मण्डल[MASC]:मण्डल aMasc;
मध्यम[FEM]:मध्यमा aFem;
मिथुन[NEUT]:मिथुन aNeuter;
मूल्य[FEM]:मूल्या aFem;
राज्य[MASC]:राज्य aMasc;
रुधिर[FEM]:रुधिरा aFem;
विधान[FEM]:विधानी eeFem;
विशाल[NEUT]:विशाल aNeuter;
वैतान[FEM]:वैतानी eeFem;
वैश्य[FEM]:वैश्या aFem;
श्याम[MASC]:श्याम aMasc;
सहस्र[MASC]:सहस्र aNeuter;
सहस्र[NEUT]:सहस्री eeFem;
साधार[FEM]:साधारा aFem;
सूक्त[MASC]:सूक्त aMasc;
सूक्त[FEM]:सूक्ता aFem;
अकूपार[NEUT]:अकूपार aNeuter;
अदृष्ट[FEM]:अदृष्टा aFem;
अमित्र[MASC]:अमित्र aMasc;
अमित्र[FEM]:अमित्रा aFem;
आथर्वण[FEM]:आथर्वणी eeFem;
आप्त्य[NEUT]:आप्त्य aNeuter;
उदात्त[FEM]:उदात्ता aFem;
जाङ्गल[MASC]:जाङ्गल aMasc;
दक्षिण[FEM]:दक्षिणा aFem;
देवयान[NEUT]:देवयान aNeuter;
नारायण[FEM]:नारायणी eeFem;
पण्डित[FEM]:पण्डिता aFem;
पार्वण[FEM]:पार्वणी eeFem;
प्रतीक[MASC]:प्रतीक aMasc;
मनुष्य[FEM]:मनुष्या aFem;
मनुष्य[NEUT]:मनुष्य aNeuter;
वैतथ्य[FEM]:वैतथ्या aFem;
वैदर्भ[MASC]:वैदर्भ aMasc;
वैदर्भ[FEM]:वैदर्भी eeFem;
साधारण[NEUT]:साधारण aNeuter;
सुन्दर[FEM]:सुन्दरा aFem;
स्वश्व[MASC]:स्वश्व aMasc;
स्वश्व[FEM]:स्वश्वा aFem;
नाचिकेत[FEM]:नाचिकेती eeFem;
नाचिकेत[NEUT]:नाचिकेत aNeuter;
पुरोहित[FEM]:पुरोहिता aFem;
ब्राह्म[MASC]:ब्राह्म aMasc;
ब्राह्म[FEM]:ब्राह्मी eeFem;
वैवाहिक[FEM]:वैवाहिकी eeFem;
व्यञ्जन[FEM]:व्यञ्जना aFem;
व्यञ्जन[NEUT]:व्यञ्जन aNeuter;
उद्गूर्ण[FEM]:उद्गूर्णा aFem;
क्षत्रिय[MASC]:क्षत्रिय aMasc;
विद्याचण[FEM]:विद्याचणा aFem;
विद्याचण[NEUT]:विद्याचण aNeuter;
वैश्वानर[FEM]:वैश्वानरी eeFem;
प्रतिबुद्ध[MASC]:प्रतिबद्ध aMasc;
प्रतिबुद्ध[FEM]:प्रतिबद्धा aFem;
चातुर्मास्य[NEUT]:चातुर्मास्य aNeuter;
गौड[FEM]:गौडी eeFem;
घोर[MASC]:घोर aMasc;
भट्ट[FEM]:भट्टा aFem;
कपि[MASC]:कपि iMasc;
कपि[FEM]:कपी eeFem;
कपि[NEUT]:कपि iNeuter;
कवि[MASC]:कवि iMasc;
कवि[NEUT]:कवि iNeuter;
बोधि[MASC]:बोधि iMasc;
बोधि[FEM]:बोधि iFem;
बोधि[NEUT]:बोधि iNeuter;
रयि[MASC]:रयि iMasc;
रयि[FEM]:रयि iFem;
रयि[NEUT]:रयि iNeuter;
वसति[MASC]:वसति iFem;
वसति[FEM]:वसति iFem;
वसति[NEUT]:वसति iNeuter;
संधि[MASC]:संधि iMasc;
संधि[FEM]:संधि iFem;
संधि[NEUT]:संधि iNeuter;
गभस्ति[MASC]:गभस्ति iMasc;
गभस्ति[FEM]:गभस्ति iFem;
गभस्ति[NEUT]:गभस्ति iNeuter;
पुरंधि[MASC]:पुरंधि iMasc;
पुरंधि[FEM]:पुरंधि iNeuter;
पुरंधि[NEUT]:पुरंधि iFem;
पुलस्ति[MASC]:पुलस्ति iMasc;
पुलस्ति[FEM]:पुलस्ति iFem;
पुलस्ति[NEUT]:पुलस्ति iNeuter;
बहुव्रीहि[MASC]:बहुव्रीहि iMasc;
बहुव्रीहि[FEM]:बहुव्रीहि iFem;
बहुव्रीहि[NEUT]:बहुव्रीहि iNeuter;
आर्य[NEUT]:आर्य aNeuter;
आर्ष[FEM]:आर्षी eeFem;
आशु[MASC]:आशु uMasc;
आशु[FEM]:आशु uFem;
आशु[NEUT]:आशु uNeuter;
तरु[MASC]:तरु uMasc;
तरु[FEM]:तरु uFem;
तरु[NEUT]:तरु uNeuter;
मनु[MASC]:मनु uMasc;
मनु[FEM]:मनु uFem;
मनु[NEUT]:मनु uNeuter;
लघु[MASC]:लघु uMasc;
लघु[FEM]:लघु uFem;
लघु[NEUT]:लघु uNeuter;
वसु[MASC]:वसु uMasc;
वसु[FEM]:वसु uFem;
वसु[NEUT]:वसु uNeuter;
अंहु[MASC]:अंहु uMasc;
अंहु[FEM]:अंहु uFem;
अंहु[NEUT]:अंहु uNeuter;
पुरु[MASC]:पुरु uMasc;
पुरु[FEM]:पूर्वी eeFem;
पुरु[NEUT]:पुरु uNeuter;
पृथु[MASC]:पृथु uMasc;
पृथु[FEM]:पृथु uFem;
पृथु[NEUT]:पृथु uNeuter;
मृदु uMasc;
साधु[MASC]:साधु uMasc;
साधु[FEM]:साध्वी eeFem;
साधु[NEUT]:साधु uNeuter;
जुगुप्सु[MASC]:जुगुप्सु uMasc;
जुगुप्सु[FEM]:जुगुप्सु uFem;
जुगुप्सु[NEUT]:जुगुप्सु uNeuter;
LEXICON Noun
अन aMasc;
पट aMasc;
वल aMasc;
कनक aMasc;
घृण aMasc;
धूम aMasc;
भुज aMasc;
मेष aMasc;
वाट aMasc;
अगाध aMasc;
अमृत aMasc;
आम्र aMasc;
कर्ण aMasc;
तल्प aMasc;
वर्ण aMasc;
उत्सव aMasc;
द्रुम aMasc;
वसन्त aMasc;
अङ्गार aMasc;
देवराज aMasc;
सुन्दर aMasc;
दिग्नाग aMasc;
वृश्चिक aMasc;
नीचामेढ्र aMasc;
अगुण aMasc;
ईषा aFem;
ग्ना aFem;
बाधा aFem;
शोभा aFem;
इच्छा aFem;
वनिता aFem;
अङ्गना aFem;
नाटिका aFem;
शर्करा aFem;
श्रद्धा aFem;
प्रार्थना aFem;
अभय aNeuter;
चीन aNeuter;
पान aNeuter;
मौन aNeuter;
अकृत aNeuter;
तटाक aNeuter;
वाहन aNeuter;
कार्य aNeuter;
निष्क aNeuter;
श्रमण aNeuter;
अभिधान aNeuter;
परिमाण aNeuter;
साधारण aNeuter;
द्युम्न aNeuter;
उपाख्यान aNeuter;
लिङ्गशरीर aNeuter;
सवन aNeuter;
पुष्प aNeuter;
साधर्म्य aNeuter;
अरि iMasc;
असि iMasc;
अहि iMasc;
ऋषि iMasc;
पति iMasc;
बलि iMasc;
मणि iMasc;
सखि iMasc;
गिरि iMasc;
हेलि iMasc;
अग्नि iMasc;
अद्रि iMasc;
ध्वनि iMasc;
समाधि iMasc;
अंह्रि iMasc;
अगस्ति iMasc;
कुक्षि iMasc;
कृत्ति iMasc;
गृहपति iMasc;
दम्पति iMasc;
प्लुषि iMasc;
बुद्धि iMasc;
महाकवि iMasc;
व्रीहि iMasc;
शल्मलि iMasc;
अङ्घ्रि iMasc;
विश्पति iMasc;
दुन्दुभि iMasc;
प्रजापति iMasc;
व्याहृति iMasc;
विद्यापति iMasc;
गति iFem;
अवि iFem;
आति iFem;
गति iFem;
जनि iFem;
मति iFem;
मषि iFem;
रति iFem;
हति iFem;
साति iFem;
ओषधि iFem;
कृमि iFem;
जाति iFem;
दिति iFem;
नाभि iFem;
नीति iFem;
भूमि iFem;
योनि iFem;
राजि iFem;
राशि iFem;
रुचि iFem;
अजाति iFem;
अश्रि iFem;
भक्ति iFem;
क्षिति iFem;
श्रोणि iFem;
स्मृति iFem;
अङ्गुलि iFem;
विभक्ति iFem;
तित्तिरि iFem;
प्रशस्ति iFem;
जीवन्मुक्ति iFem;
उक्ति iFem;
दृष्टि iFem;
वृद्धि iFem;
गविष्टि iFem;
वारि iNeuter;
अक्षि iNeuter;
अस्थि iNeuter;
इदानि iNeuter;
ऋद्धि iNeuter;
शान्ति iNeuter;
वर्तनी eeFem;
धरित्री eeFem;
बिडाली eeFem;
पत्नी eeFem;
नारी eeFem;
धी eeFem;
पाप:पापी eeFem;
देवी eeFem;
पेशी eeFem;
छल्ली eeFem;
मयूरी eeFem;
रासभी eeFem;
नान्दी eeFem;
पृथ्वी eeFem;
तन्त्री eeFem;
पार्वती eeFem;
भण्डाकी eeFem;
सरस्वती eeFem;
गृहपत्नी eeFem;
पलित:पलिक्नी eeFem;
आखु:आक्हु uMasc;
ऋतु uMasc;
मरु uMasc;
अंशु uMasc;
केतु uMasc;
जानु uMasc;
डमरु uMasc;
तायु uMasc;
द्यु uMasc;
द्रु uMasc;
धातु uMasc;
राहु uMasc;
वेणु uMasc;
हेतु uMasc;
अक्तु uMasc;
गुरु uMasc;
अगुरु uMasc;
इन्दु uMasc;
दस्यु uMasc;
मन्यु uMasc;
शत्रु uMasc;
परमाणु uMasc;
पृदाकु uMasc;
भिक्षु uMasc;
मृत्यु uMasc;
विष्णु uMasc;
निघण्टु uMasc;
अध्वर्यु uMasc;
सभास्थाणु uMasc;
चन्द्रबिन्दु uMasc;
वेणु uMasc;
मृदु uMasc;
तरु uMasc;
सिन्धु uFem;
धेनु uFem;
आलु uNeuter;
लघु uNeuter;
वसु uNeuter;
दारु uNeuter;
पृथु uNeuter;
यातु uNeuter;
अश्रु uNeuter;
तर्कु uNeuter;
बिन्दु uNeuter;
मधु uNeuter;
तन्तु uNeuter;
वधू ooFem;
जुहू ooFem;
स्वपू ooFem;
श्वश्रू ooFem;
तनू ooFem;
